Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.010

Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Animal massage therapist" means an individual with a license to practice massage therapy in this state with additional training in animal therapy.

(2) "Board" means the Washington state board of massage.

(3) "Certified reflexologist" means an individual who is certified under this chapter.

(4) "Health carrier" means the same as the definition in RCW 48.43.005.

(5) "Intraoral massage" means the manipulation or pressure of soft tissue inside the mouth or oral cavity for therapeutic purposes.

(6) "Massage" and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes. Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction, reflexology, Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and fascial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force, nor does it include genital manipulation.

(7) "Massage business" means the operation of a business where massages are given.

(8) "Massage therapist" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(9) "Reflexology" means a health care service that is limited to applying alternating pressure with thumb and finger techniques to reflexive areas of the lower one-third of the extremities, feet, hands, and outer ears based on reflex maps. Reflexology does not include the diagnosis of or treatment for specific diseases, or joint manipulations.

(10) "Reflexology business" means the operation of a business where reflexology services are provided.

(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[ 2016 c 41 s 1. Prior: 2012 c 137 s 3; 2007 c 272 s 1; 2002 c 277 s 1; 2001 c 297 s 2; 1997 c 297 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 252; 1987 c 443 s 2; 1979 c 158 s 74; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: "This act takes effect July 1, 2017." [ 2016 c 41 s 28.]

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.

Findings—Intent—2001 c 297: "The legislature finds that massage therapists have contributed significantly to the welfare of humans. The legislature also finds that massage therapists can have a significant positive impact on the well-being of animals, especially in the equine industry.

It is the legislature's intent to have the Washington state board of massage adopt rules under their current authority providing for an endorsement for currently licensed massage practitioners to perform animal massage upon completion of certain training courses." [ 2001 c 297 s 1.]